Illinois, session 104th, SB833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois AgrAbility Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 235/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois AgrAbility Act. 9(Source: P.A. 94-216, eff. 7-14-05.)